Maryland, session 2026, HB1617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 14A. HEALTH INNOVATION ZONES.
20–14A–01.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “HEALTH INNOVATION ZONE” MEANS A CONTIGUOUS
GEOGRAPHIC AREA THAT:
(1) DEMONSTRATES MEASURABLE AND DOCUMENTED HEALTH
DISPARITIES AND POOR HEALTH OUTCOMES, INCLUDING HIGH RATES OF:
(I) MATERNAL HEALTH COMPLICATIONS;
(II) NEWBORN HEALTH COMPLICATIONS; AND
(III) CHRONIC AND INFECTIOUS DISEASES;
(2) IS POPULATED BY:
(I) COMMUNITIES OF COLOR;
(II) COMMUNITIES WITH LOW–INCOME HOUSEHOLDS;
(III) COMMUNITIES WITH A HIGH IMMIGRANT POPULATION; OR
(IV) ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED COMMUNITIES; AND
(3) IS SMALL ENOUGH TO ALLOW FOR THE INCENTIVES UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE TO HAVE A SIGNIFICANT IMPACT ON IMPROVING HEALTH OUTCOMES AND
REDUCING HEALTH DISPARITIES, INCLUDING RACIAL, ETHNIC, GEOGRAPHIC, AND
DISABILITY–RELATED HEALTH DISPARITIES IN RURAL COMMUNITIES.
20–14A–02.
(A) SUBJECT TO § 20–14A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE LOCAL ZONING
AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY MAY DESIGNATE A HEALTH INNOVATION ZONE IF THE
AREA TO BE DESIGNATED:
(1) IS A FOOD OR HEALTH CARE DESERT;

HOUSE BILL 1617 3
(2) HAS A HIGH CONCENTRATION OF:
(I) CANCER;
(II) DIABETES;
(III) HEART DISEASE; OR
(IV) HYPERTENSION; AND
(3) HAS A LOW PREVALENCE OF GROCERY STORES, PHARMACIES,
PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS, AND SPECIALTY CARE PROVIDERS.
(B) IF A LOCAL ZONING AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY DESIGNATES A HEALTH
INNOVATION ZONE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE COUNTY SHALL
ESTABLISH, BY LAW, INCENTIVES THAT WILL BE PROVIDED TO GROCERY STORES,
PHARMACIES, PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS, AND SPECIALTY CARE PROVIDERS THAT
LOCATE IN THE HEALTH INNOVATION ZONE.
20–14A–03.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MEDCO” MEANS THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION.
(3) “PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BLUE LINE CORRIDOR” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 10–601 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(C) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY COUNCIL SHALL DESIGNATE A
HEALTH INNOVATION ZONE IN THE FOLLOWING AREAS:
(1) PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BLUE LINE CORRIDOR; AND
(2) THE AREA LOCATED WITHIN 2 MILES OF THE BORDER BETWEEN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY AND THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA.
(D) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY COUNCIL MAY DESIGNATE
ADDITIONAL HEALTH INNOVATION ZONES IF THE AREA TO BE DESIGNATED:

HOUSE BILL 1617
(1) IS A FOOD OR HEALTH CARE DESERT;
(2) HAS A HIGH CONCENTRATION OF:
(I) CANCER;
(II) DIABETES;
(III) HEART DISEASE; OR
(IV) HYPERTENSION; AND
(3) HAS A LOW PREVALENCE OF GROCERY STORES, PHARMACIES,
PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS, AND SPECIALTY CARE PROVIDERS.
(E) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL MAY,
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET, INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL
BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $5,000,000 TO MEDCO TO
ENCOURAGE GROCERY STORES, PHARMACIES, PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS, AND
SPECIALTY CARE PROVIDERS TO LOCATE IN A HEALTH INNOVATION ZONE
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(F) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, MEDCO SHALL PROVIDE FUNDING TO
ENCOURAGE GROCERY STORES, PHARMACIES, PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS, AND
SPECIALTY CARE PROVIDERS TO ESTABLISH A BUSINESS IN A HEALTH INNOVATION
ZONE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(G) MEDCO SHALL LOOK FOR ADDITIONAL FUNDING SOURCES TO
ENCOURAGE HEALTH INNOVATION BUSINESS GROWTH IN A HEALTH INNOVATION
ZONE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
20–14A–04.
A GROCERY STORE, PHARMACY, PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER, AND SPECIALTY
CARE PROVIDER LOCATED IN A HEALTH INNOVATION ZONE ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE ARE NOT SUBJECT TO LOCAL ZONING OR LAND USE LAWS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.